Illinois, session 104th, HB318.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juror Protection Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 320/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Juror 8Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-186, eff. 1-1-06.)